Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202684-1309.01
Board; provide benefit liability information.

The board shall provide benefit liability information and other assistance to the Nebraska Investment Council for the establishment of policy portfolio objectives for the investing and reinvesting of the assets of the retirement system.

Laws 1984, LB 653, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 847, § 43;

Laws 2005, LB 503, § 15;

Laws 2026, LB821, § 2.
July 18, 2026